New Jersey, session 222, A1235.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    R.S.23:3-4 is amended to read as follows: 23:3-4.    The licenses issued under this article shall include, among others authorized by law, the following: a.     A license issued to a person above 16 years of age, or in the case of an apprentice firearm hunting license or an apprentice bow and arrow license, a license issued to a person above 14 years of age, who has an actual and bona fide domicile in this State at the time of the application for the license and who has had an actual and bona fide domicile in this State for at least [six months] 60 days immediately prior thereto, provided that for a resident's trapping license the person shall be above 12 years of age.  These licenses shall be designated as the resident's firearm hunting license, the resident's bow and arrow license, the resident's trapping license, the resident's fishing license, the resident's apprentice firearm hunting license, and the resident's apprentice bow and arrow license. (1)   (a)   The resident's firearm hunting license shall authorize its holder to hunt with hounds and firearms only, and a fee of $26.50 and an issuance fee of $1.00 shall be charged therefor, except that a person above the age of 65 years shall be charged a fee of $14.50 and an issuance fee of $1.00. (b)   The resident's apprentice firearm hunting license shall authorize its holder to hunt only with hounds and firearms and only when accompanied by a holder, above 21 years of age, of a regular resident's or nonresident's firearm hunting license.  A fee of $26.50 and an issuance fee of $1.00 shall be charged for a resident's apprentice firearm hunting license, except that a person above the age of 65 years shall be charged a fee of $14.50 and an issuance fee of $1.00.  The resident's apprentice firearm hunting license may be issued to a person only twice during the lifetime of the person. (2)   (a)   The resident's bow and arrow license shall authorize its holder to hunt with bow and arrow only, and a fee of $30.50 and an issuance fee of $1.00 shall be charged therefor, except that a person above the age of 65 years shall be charged a fee of $15.50 and an issuance fee of $1.00. (b)   The resident's apprentice bow and arrow license shall authorize its holder to hunt only with bow and arrow and only when accompanied by a holder, above 21 years of age, of a regular resident's or nonresident's bow and arrow license.  A fee of $30.50 and an issuance fee of $1.00 shall be charged for a resident's apprentice bow and arrow license, except that a person above the age of 65 years shall be charged a fee of $15.50 and an issuance fee of $1.00.  The resident's apprentice bow and arrow license may be issued to a person only twice during the lifetime of the person. (3)   The resident's trapping license shall authorize its holder to trap only, and a fee of $31.50 and an issuance fee of $1.00 shall be charged therefor, except that a person above 12 years and under 16 years of age shall be charged no fee. (4)   The resident's fishing license shall authorize its holder to fish only, and a fee of $21.50 and an issuance fee of $1.00 shall be charged therefor, except (a) in any case where the applicant is above 70 years of age and is otherwise qualified, no license shall be required, (b) a person above 65 years and under 70 years of age shall be charged a fee of $11.50 and an issuance fee of $1.00, and (c) as otherwise provided in paragraph (5) of this subsection, paragraph (2) of subsection c. of this section, or paragraph (2) of subsection d. of section 11 of P.L.1982, c.180 (C.23:3-1.1). (5)   The resident's fishing buddy license shall authorize its holder to fish only, and can only be obtained through application at the same time with:  (a) another resident of this State who applies for a resident's fishing license, is above 16 years of age and below 65 years of age, and has not bought a resident's fishing license after 2010, or (b) a nonresident who applies for a nonresident's annual fishing license, is above 16 years of age, and has not bought a nonresident's annual fishing license after 2010.  The fee for a resident's fishing buddy license and for a resident's fishing license issued pursuant to this paragraph shall each be $10.75 and an issuance fee of $1.00.  The fee for a nonresident's annual fishing license issued pursuant to this paragraph shall be $16.50 and an issuance fee of $1.00. (6)   Any resident of this State who is totally blind, upon application to the division, shall be entitled to a resident's fishing license without fee or charge. b.    A license issued to a person above 16 years of age, or in the case of an apprentice firearm hunting license or an apprentice bow and arrow license, a license issued to a person above 14 years of age, not entitled to a resident's license, authorizing the person to trap or to hunt, as applicable, except that a nonresident's two-day small game firearm hunting license shall not permit the taking, hunting, or killing of deer or turkey.  These licenses shall be designated as the nonresident's firearm hunting license, the nonresident's apprentice firearm hunting license, the nonresident's bow and arrow license, the nonresident's apprentice bow and arrow license, the nonresident's trapping license, and the nonresident's two-day small game firearm hunting license. A nonresident's apprentice firearm hunting license shall authorize its holder to hunt only with hounds and firearms and only when accompanied by a holder, above 21 years of age, of a regular resident's or nonresident's firearm hunting license.  A nonresident's apprentice bow and arrow license shall authorize its holder to hunt with bow and arrow only and only when accompanied by a holder, above 21 years of age, of a regular resident's or nonresident's bow and arrow license.  The nonresident's apprentice firearm hunting license and the nonresident's apprentice bow and arrow license may each be issued to a person only twice during the lifetime of the person. (1)   The fees for the nonresident's firearm hunting license, the nonresident's apprentice firearm hunting license, the nonresident's bow and arrow license, and the nonresident's apprentice bow and arrow license shall each be $134.50 and an issuance fee of $1.00. (2)   The fee for the nonresident's trapping license shall be $199.50 and an issuance fee of $1.00. (3)   The fee for a nonresident's two-day small game firearm hunting license shall be $35.50 and an issuance fee of $1.00. c.     A license issued to a person above 16 years of age not entitled to a resident's license, authorizing the person to fish only. These licenses shall be designated as the nonresident's annual fishing license, the nonresident's annual fishing buddy license, the nonresident's two-day fishing license, valid for a period of two consecutive days, and the nonresident's seven-day vacation fishing license, valid for a period of seven consecutive days. The nonresident's annual fishing buddy license can only be obtained through application at the same time with:  a resident of this State who applies for a resident's fishing license, is above 16 years of age and below 65 years of age, and has not bought a resident's fishing license after 2010; or a nonresident who applies for a nonresident's annual fishing license, is above 16 years of age, and has not bought a nonresident's annual fishing license after 2010. (1)   The fee for the nonresident's annual fishing license shall be $33.00 and an issuance fee of $1.00, except as otherwise provided pursuant to paragraph (2) of this subsection, paragraph (5) of subsection a. of this section, or paragraph (2) of subsection d. of section 11 of P.L.1982, c.180 (C.23:3-1.1). (2)   The fee for a nonresident's annual fishing buddy license shall be $16.50 and an issuance fee of $1.00.  The fee for a resident's fishing license obtained through application at the same time with an application for a nonresident's annual fishing buddy license in accordance with this subsection shall be $10.75 and an issuance fee of $1.00, and the fee for a nonresident's annual fishing license obtained through application at the same time with an application for a nonresident's annual fishing buddy license in accordance with this subsection shall be $16.50 and an issuance fee of $1.00. (3)   The fee for the nonresident's two-day fishing license shall be $8.00 and an issuance fee of $1.00. (4)   The fee for the nonresident's seven-day fishing license shall be $18.50 and an issuance fee of $1.00. d.    Every license issued hereunder shall be void after December 31 next succeeding its issuance, except the one-day hunting license, which shall expire on the date of issuance; the nonresident's seven-day fishing license, which is valid only for seven consecutive days after date of issuance; the nonresident's two-day fishing license, which shall expire on the day after the date of issuance; and the nonresident's two-day small game firearm hunting license, which shall expire on the day after the date of issuance. Any license issued hereunder to a person under 16 years of age shall be void after December 31 of the year in which the licensee becomes 16 years of age. e.     The fees for licenses set forth in this section may be adjusted by the Fish and Game Council pursuant to section 12 of P.L.1982, c.180 (C.23:3-1a). (cf: P.L.2017, c.131, s.63) 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.